Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4504
Fiduciary duty.

(a) In exercising the decanting power, an authorized fiduciary shall act in accordance with its fiduciary duties, including the duty to act in accordance with the purposes of the first trust.

(b) The Uniform Trust Decanting Act does not create or imply a duty to exercise the decanting power or to inform beneficiaries about the applicability of the act.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in a first-trust instrument, for purposes of the act and section 30-3866 and subsection (a) of section 38-3867, the terms of the first trust are deemed to include the decanting power.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 14.